West Virginia, session 2026, SB1036.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 13. Sustainable Child-Serving Workforce and Foster Care Modernization ACT. §49-13-1. Foster care rate modernization and workforce stabilization. (a) The Department of Human Services, Bureau for Social Services, shall rebase basic, special, and therapeutic foster care rates using current cost data for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026.(b) Therapeutic foster care and child-placing agency administrative rates shall be adjusted to reflect current costs and include incentive payments for retention and placement stability. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home